Illinois, session 104th, HB4557.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Digital Forgeries in Politics Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Digital forgery" means any audio or visual material that 8has been created, materially manipulated, altered, or 9annotated to appear to be a realistic record of an act, speech, 10conduct, absence, or appearance of an individual that a 11reasonable person would incorrectly believe to be a true 12depiction of that individual and that falsely depicts an 13individual engaged in speech or conduct in which the depicted 14individual did not engage.15    "Regular election" has the meaning given to that term in 16Section 1-3 of the Election Code. 17    Section 10. Civil action.18    (a) An individual depicted in a digital forgery who is a 19resident of Illinois and who is a candidate for office in this 20State has a cause of action against any person who knowingly 21distributes or enters into an agreement with another person to 22distribute a digital forgery if:.  HB4557- 2 -LRB104 16403 JRC 29793 b1        (1) the distribution occurs within 90 days before a 2    regular election; and3        (2) the distribution is reasonably likely to harm the 4    reputation or electoral prospects of a candidate in an 5    election.6    (b) This Section does not apply to digitally manipulated 7audiovisual material that includes a clear and conspicuous 8disclaimer informing the viewer or listener that the media has 9been manipulated by technical means and depicts speech or 10conduct that did not occur. The following disclaimer is 11sufficient, but not necessary, to satisfy the requirements 12under this paragraph: "This (image, audio, or video) has been 13manipulated by technical means and depicts speech or conduct 14that did not occur.".15    The court shall consider the following factors in 16determining whether the disclaimer was clear and conspicuous:17        (1) if the media is a video, the media includes a 18    disclaimer that:19            (A) appears throughout the entirety of the video;20            (B) is clearly visible to and readable by an 21        observer;22            (C) is in letters at least as large as the majority 23        of any text communication, or if there is no other text 24        communication, in a size that is easily readable by 25        the average viewer; and26            (D) is in the same language as the language used in   HB4557- 3 -LRB104 16403 JRC 29793 b1        the video media;2        (2) if the media consists only of audio and contains 3    no image or video, the media includes a disclaimer that is 4    read at the beginning and end of the media in a clearly 5    spoken manner, in a pitch that can be easily heard by the 6    average listener, and in the same language as the audio 7    media;8        (3) if the media is an image, the media includes a 9    disclaimer that:10            (A) is clearly visible to and readable by the 11        average viewer;12            (B) if the media contains other text, is in 13        letters at least as large as the majority of the other 14        text; and15            (C) is in the same language as the language used in 16        the image media; and17        (4) if the media was generated by editing an existing 18    image, audio, or video, the media includes a citation 19    directing the viewer or listener to the original source 20    from which the unedited version of the existing image, 21    audio, or video was obtained. 22    Section 15. Remedies.23    (a) A court in which an action is brought under this Act, 24on the motion of a party, may issue a temporary restraining 25order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction   HB4557- 4 -LRB104 16403 JRC 29793 b1ordering the defendant to cease the display or distribution of 2the digital forgery.3    (b) A prevailing plaintiff may additionally be awarded:4        (1) the greater of:5            (A) economic and noneconomic damages proximately 6        caused by the creation or distribution of the digital 7        forgery; or8            (B) statutory damages not to exceed $10,000 9        against each defendant found liable under this Act for 10        each instance that individual distributed the media or 11        for each instance the media was distributed under an 12        agreement made to distribute the media;13        (2) punitive damages; or14        (3) the costs of the action, including reasonable 15    attorney's fees and other reasonable litigation costs.16    (c) This Act does not affect a right or remedy available 17under any other law of this State. 18    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 19severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.